Utah statutes.
53B-14-109.   Rules for hearings.

The board may adopt rules for the implementation of Sections 53B-14-104 and 53B-14-105, including rules for the conduct of hearings and appointment of hearing examiners.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

